pl: Typ gwintu dyszy: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Wulkan; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta navoja mlaznice: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Ostalo
zh-TW: 噴嘴螺紋類型: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; 火山; 其他
sl-SI: Tip navoja šobe: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Drugo
da: Dysegevindtype: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Vulkan; Andet
ja: ノズルのねじタイプ: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; スーパーボルケーノ; ボルケーノ; その他
de: Düsengewindetyp: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Sonstiges
tr: Nozul diş tipi: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Süper Volcano; Volkan; Diğer
it: Tipo di filettatura dell'ugello: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Altro
cs: Typ závitu trysky: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Jiné
el: Τύπος σπειρώματος ακροφυσίου: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Άλλο
bg-BG: Тип резба на дюзата: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Вулкан; Други
nl: Nozzle schroefdraadtype: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Vulkaan; Andere
vi: Loại ren đầu phun: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Khác
fr: Type de filetage de buse: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcan; Autre
sv: Munstycksgängtyp: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Vulkan; Övrigt
ru: Тип резьбы сопла: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Вулкан; Другой
es: Tipo de rosca de la boquilla: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Otros
th: ประเภทเกลียวหัวฉีด: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; ทรงภูเขาไฟ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tipo de rosca do bico: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Outro
nb: Dysegjengetype: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Vulkan; Annet
ko: 노즐 나사 유형: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; 프루사 넥스트루더; Revo; 슈퍼 볼케이노; 화산; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de rosca do bico: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Vulcão; Outro
hu: Fúvókamenet típusa: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Egyéb
zh-CN: 喷嘴螺纹类型: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; 火山; 其他
lt-LT: Antgalio sriegio tipas: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; „Volcano“; Kita
fi: Suuttimen kierretyyppi: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Tulivuori; Muu
en: Nozzle thread type: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Other
sk-SK: Typ závitu trysky: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Iné
ro-RO: Tip filet duză: E3D V6; M10; M6; M7; M8; MK10; MK8; Prusa Nextruder; Revo; Super Volcano; Volcano; Altele